Illinois, session 104th, HB603.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The State Employee Indemnification Act is 5amended by changing Section 0.01 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 350/0.01)  (from Ch. 127, par. 1300)7    Sec. 0.01. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8State Employee Indemnification Act.9(Source: P.A. 86-1324.)